Utah statutes.
10-3-1003.   Civil service commission -- Number, term, vacancies.

(1) (a)  A city of the first or second class may establish a civil service commission under this part.

(b)  A city that establishes a civil service commission under this part may dissolve the civil service commission.

(2)  Each civil service commission under this part shall consist of three members appointed by the city legislative body.

(3) (a)  The term of office of commission members shall be six years, but members shall be appointed so that the term of office of one member shall expire on the 30th day of June of each even-numbered year.

(b)  If a vacancy occurs in the civil service commission, it shall be filled by appointment by the city legislative body for the unexpired term.

